utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.dic
aizbyzuot/HLN37-
aizbuozt/0HMN38-
aizcept/0HMN38-
aizdyukt/0HLN38-
aizdruozt/0HMN38-
aizdzyrdynuot/HLN37-
aizglobuot/HLN370-
aizgrīzt/0HMN38-
aizguozt/0HMN38-
aizīskuot/HLN370-
aizklabynuot/HLN370-
aizkrist/0HMN38-
aizkuortuot/HLN370-
aizlauzt/0HMN38-
aizleiguot/HLN370-
aizleikt/0FMN18-
aizluodēt/ILN470-
aizmeit/0HMN18-
aizmest/0HMN38-
aizmyurēt/HLN370-
aiznest/0HMN38-
aizpeit/0HMN18-
aizpleist/0FMN18-
aizpludynuot/HLN370-
aizraut/0FLN17-
aizrūtuot/HLN370-
aizsist/0HMN38-
aizskoluot/HLN370-
aizspīgt/0HLN38-
aizšaravuot/HLN370-
aizteit/0HMN18-
aiztierpt/0FMN18-
aiztyukt/0FMN18-
aiztreit/0HMN18-
aiztupt/0FMN18-
aizveit/0FMN18-
aizvirt/0HMN37-
aizvuokt/0HLN38-
apberzt/0HMN38-
apbūrt/0HLN38-
apcept/0HMN38-
apdadzynuot/HLN370-
apdūmuot/HLN370-
apdzonuot/HLN370-
apgraizeit/ILN470-
apgrauzt/0HMN38-
apguozt/0HMN38-
apīskuot/HLN370-
apkleikuot/HLN370-
apkuopelēt/HLN370-
aplaupeit/ILN470-
aplauzt/0HMN38-
aplomuot/HLN370-
apmeiļuot/HLN370-
apmest/0HMN38-
apmulsynuot/HLN370-
appeit/0HMN18-
applyukuot/HLN370-
aprast/0HMN38-
aprypynuot/HLN370-
apsaudeit/ILN470-
apsist/0HMN38-
apskraideit/ILN470-
apsluopt/0FMN18-
apsmydzynuot/HLN370-
apstoruot/HLN370-
apteit/0HMN18-
aptreit/0HMN18-
aptuļzt/0HMN38-
apveit/0FMN18-
apviļkt/0HLN37-
apvuorgt/0FMN18-
atauklēt/HLN370-
atbruozt/0HMN38-
atbubynuot/HLN370-
atdruozt/0HMN38-
atdunguot/HLN370-
atgrauzt/0HMN38-
atgrīzt/0HMN38-
atklaiguot/HLN370-
atkrist/0HNM38-
atlaipuot/HLN370-
atleikt/0FMN18-
atmauduot/HLN370-
atmest/0HMN38-
atneikt/0FMN18-
atnest/0HMN38-
atpazeit/0FMN18-
atplaukt/0FMN17-
atpūguot/HLN370-
atsacīmuot/HLN37-
atsist/0HMN38-
atslaukt/0HLN38-
atspiergt/0FMN18-
atstuovēt/ILN470-
atteit/0HMN18-
attryukt/0FMN18-
atveiduot/HLN370-
atveit/0FMN18-
atzeimēt/HLN370-
atžiergt/0FMN18-
buozt/HMN38-
cept/HMN38-
daaudzynuot/HLN370-
dacept/0HMN38-
dacyluot/HLN370-
dagraizeit/ILN470-
dagrīzt/0HMN38-
daklauseit/ILN470-
daleiguot/HLN370-
daleikt/0FMN18-
damest/0HMN38-
damyrguot/HLN370-
danest/0HMN38-
dapleist/0FMN18-
dapuškuot/HLN370-
dasaldēt/HLN370-
dasist/0HMN38-
dastaiguot/HLN370-
dateit/0HMN18-
datreit/0HMN18-
datupt/0FMN18-
davyzynuot/HLN370-
druozt/HMN38-
džeibt/FMN18-
geibt/FMN18-
grīzt/HMN38-
iveit/0FMN18-
izberzt/0HMN38-
izbruozt/0HMN38-
izbuozt/0HMN38-
izbūzt/0HMN38-
izčuopt/0FMN18-
izdeldēt/HLN370-
izdruozt/0HMN38-
izgiut/0FLN17-
izgrīzt/0HMN38-
izkaukt/0HLN38-
izkrist/0HNM38-
izkuortuot/HLN370-
izleikt/0FMN18-
izlikt/0HLN37-
izmeklēt/HLN370-
izmierkt/0FMN18-
iznest/0HMN38-
izpeļneit/HKN360-
izplaukt/0FMN17-
izreikuot/HLN370-
izsekuot/HLN370-
izsluopt/0FMN18-
izspīgt/0HLN38-
izšliucynuot/HLN370-
izteit/0HMN18-
iztryukt/0FMN18-
izuordeit/ILN470-
izvuoļuot/HLN370-
izvuorgt/0FMN18-
ībyzuot/HLN37-
ībruozt/0HMN38-
īcept/0HMN38-
īčupinēt/HLN370-
īdzyrdynuot/HLN37-
īgrauzt/0HMN38-
īguozt/0HMN38-
īknuobuot/HLN37-
īleiguot/HLN370-
īleikt/0FMN18-
īmeistaruot/HLN370-
īmest/0HMN38-
īnest/0HMN38-
īpeipuot/HLN370-
īpeit/0HMN18-
īrast/0HMN38-
īraudzēt/HLN370-
īsaut/0FLN17-
īsist/0HMN38-
īsleikt/0FMN18-
īsliepuot/HLN370-
īsvylynuot/HLN37-
ītuļzt/0HMN38-
īturēt/ILN470-
īvirt/0HMN37-
īvuoļuot/HLN370-
leigt/FMN18-
meit/HMN18-
neikt/FMN18-
nutārpynuot/HLN370-
nūberzt/0HMN38-
nūbrīdynuot/HLN370-
nūbuozt/0HMN38-
nūčuopt/0FMN18-
nūčuruot/HLN370-
nūdzeivuot/HLN370-
nūdžeibt/0FMN18-
nūgrabynuot/HLN370-
nūguozt/0HMN38-
nūkiupynuot/HLN37-
nūkuortuot/HLN370-
nūlauzt/0HMN38-
nūleikt/0FMN18-
nūliduot/HLN370-
nūmāruot/HLN370-
nūmest/0HMN38-
nūmozguot/HLN370-
nūneikt/0FMN18-
nūpeit/0HMN18-
nūpraseit/ILN470-
nūreibt/0FMN18-
nūrysynuot/HLN370-
nūsādynuot/HLN370-
nūsluobt/0FMN18-
nūsluopt/0FMN18-
nūspruogt/0FMN18-
nūstuodynuot/HLN370-
nūštukuot/HLN370-
nūtreit/0HMN18-
nūtuļzt/0HMN38-
nūtveikt/0FMN18-
nūuordeit/ILN470-
nūvīnuot/HLN370-
nūvuorgt/0FMN18-
nūžvūrgt/0HLN38-
paberzt/0HMN38-
pabraukuot/HLN370-
padabuot/HLN370-
padruozt/0HMN38-
padzyrdynuot/HLN37-
pageibt/0FMN18-
pagrabēt/ILN470-
pagrīzt/0HMN38-
pakaruot/HLN370-
pakrist/0HNM38-
pakuopelēt/HLN370-
paleikt/0FMN18-
palelynuot/HLN370-
pamaluot/HLN370-
pamest/0HMN38-
pamozguot/HLN370-
paneikt/0FMN18-
papleist/0FMN18-
papludynuot/HLN370-
pariekinuot/HLN37-
pasegt/0HLN37-
pasist/0HMN38-
paslymuot/HLN37-
pasuoleit/HKN360-
pataiseit/ILN470-
patreit/0HMN18-
pavadeit/ILN470-
paveit/0FMN18-
pavuokt/0HLN38-
pavuorgt/0FMN18-
pazeit/FMN18-
peit/HMN18-
pīaicynuot/HLN370-
pīberzt/0HMN38-
pīcept/0HMN38-
pīčyvynuot/HLN37-
pīdeigt/0FMN18-
pīdzimt/0HLN37-
pīgrauzt/0HMN38-
pīguoduot/HLN370-
pīguozt/0HMN38-
pīkruosuot/HLN370-
pīlauzt/0HMN38-
pīleikt/0FMN18-
pīliduot/HLN370-
pīmest/0HMN38-
pīmērcēt/HLN370-
pīnest/0HMN38-
pīpleist/0FMN18-
pīpļaut/0FLN17-
pīryugt/0FLN18-
pīsist/0HMN38-
pīsyukt/0HLN38-
pīstruoduot/HLN370-
pītyvynuot/HLN370-
pītryukt/0FMN18-
pītupt/0FMN18-
pīvolkuot/HLN370-
pleist/FMN18-
puorberzt/0HMN38-
puorbruozt/0HMN38-
puorcept/0HMN38-
puorčatuot/HLN370-
puorgaismuot/HLN370-
puorgrauzt/0HMN38-
puorguozt/0HMN38-
puorkleikuot/HLN370-
puorleikt/0FMN18-
puorleit/0FLN17-
puormāruot/HLN370-
puormierkt/0FMN18-
puornest/0HMN38-
puorpleist/0FMN18-
puorsaceit/ILN470-
puorskuobēt/HLN370-
puorspruogt/0FMN18-
puorstuovēt/ILN470-
puortreit/0HMN18-
puortrīkt/0HLN38-
puortveikt/0FMN18-
puorvirt/0HMN37-
puorvolkuot/HLN370-
rast/HMN38-
saaicynuot/HLN370-
sabruozt/0HMN38-
sabubynuot/HLN370-
sabūzt/0HMN38-
sačuopt/0FMN18-
sadadzynuot/HLN370-
sadzeltēt/HLN370-
sagraizeit/ILN470-
sagrauzt/0HMN38-
saguozt/0HMN38-
sakaltēt/HLN370-
sakrist/0HNM38-
saleidzynuot/HLN370-
saleigt/0FMN18-
saluodēt/ILN470-
sameit/0HMN18-
samerkavuot/HLN370-
samierkt/0FMN18-
sanest/0HMN38-
sanosuot/HLN370-
sapeikt/0FMN18-
saplaukt/0FMN17-
sapraseit/ILN470-
sareibt/0FMN18-
sarypynuot/HLN370-
sasaut/0FLN17-
saskuobt/0FMN18-
saslaukt/0HLN38-
sasluobt/0FMN18-
saspruogt/0FMN18-
sastoruot/HLN370-
sašliucynuot/HLN370-
satierpt/0FMN18-
satreit/0HMN18-
satuļzt/0HMN38-
satveikt/0FMN18-
saviļkt/0HLN37-
savirt/0HMN37-
sazeimuot/HLN370-
skuobt/FMN18-
sluobt/FMN18-
spiergt/FMN18-
teit/HMN18-
tyukt/FMN18-
tryukt/FMN18-
tveikt/FMN18-
veit/FMN18-
virt/HMN37-
žiergt/FMN18-
